Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.021

Standards and label requirements—Rules.

(1) The department shall establish by rule standards and label requirements for the following seed types: Agricultural seed (including grass, lawn, and turf seed), flower seed, and vegetable seed.

(2) The standards and label requirements shall be divided into the following categories:

(a) Percentage of kind and variety of each seed component present; and

(b) Percentage of weed seed (restricted and common).

(3) The standards and label requirements developed by the department shall at a minimum include:

(a) Amount of inert material;

(b) Specifics and warning for treated seed;

(c) Specifics for coated seed;

(d) Specifics and duration for inoculated seed;

(e) Specifics for seed which is below standard;

(f) Specifics for seed contained in containers, mats, tapes, or other planting devices;

(g) Specifics for seed sold in bulk;

(h) Specifics for hybrid seed; and

(i) Specifics for seed mixtures.

[ 1989 c 354 s 71.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 354 ss 70-81 and 84-86: See note following RCW 15.49.005.

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.